Utah statutes.
48-2c-709.   Withdrawal of a member.

A member may withdraw from a company at the time or upon the happening of events specified in and in accordance with the articles of organization or operating agreement.  If the articles of organization or operating agreement do not specify the time or the events upon the happening of which a member may withdraw, a member may not withdraw prior to the dissolution and completion of winding up of the company, without the written consent of all other members at the time.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session

